Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB68.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3307(a) and (b) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 3307. Institutional vandalism.(a) Offenses defined.--A person commits the offense of institutional vandalism if he knowingly desecrates, [as defined in section 5509 (relating to desecration or sale of venerated objects)] destroys, vandalizes, defaces or otherwise damages:(1) any church, synagogue [or], mosque or any other facility or place used for religious worship or other religious purposes;(2) any cemetery, mortuary or other facility used for the purpose of burial or memorializing the dead;12345678910111213141516171819 (3) any school, educational facility, community center, municipal building, courthouse facility, State or local government building or vehicle or juvenile detention center;(4) the grounds adjacent to and owned or occupied by any facility set forth in paragraph (1), (2) or (3); or(5) any personal property located in any facility set forth in this subsection.* * *(b) Grading.--An offense under this section [is a felony of the third degree if the act is one of desecration as defined in section 5509 or if the actor causes pecuniary loss in excess of $5,000. Pecuniary loss includes the cost of repair or replacement of the property affected. Otherwise, institutional vandalism is a misdemeanor of the second degree.] shall be graded as follows:(1) A felony of the first degree if death results from the act committed in violation of this section.(2) A felony of the second degree if bodily injury to a person, including a public safety officer performing duties as a direct or proximate result of conduct prohibited by this section, results from the act committed in violation of this section or if the act includes the use, attempted use or threatened use of an instrument of crime, explosives or fire.(3) A felony of the third degree if:(i) bodily injury to a person, including a public safety officer performing duties as a direct or proximate result of conduct prohibited by this section, results from the act committed in violation of this section;(ii) the act is one of desecration; or(iii) the actor causes pecuniary loss, which 20250SB0068PN0028 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 includes the cost of repair or replacement of the property affected, in excess of $2,000.(4) A misdemeanor of the first degree for all other violations of this section.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Desecrate." As defined in section 5509(b) (relating to desecration, theft or sale of venerated objects)."Desecration." As the term "desecrate" is defined in section 5509(b)."Instrument of crime." As defined in section 907 (relating to possessing instruments of crime).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0068PN0028 - 3 - 1234567891011121314